Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Home Inspectors

198B.700.
Definitions for KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738.

As used in KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738, unless otherwise provided:

“Applicant” means an individual who applies for a license as a home inspector;

“Board” means the Kentucky Board of Home Inspectors established in KRS 198B.704;

“Client” means a person who contracts with a licensed home inspector to obtain a home inspection and subsequent written home inspection report;

“Home inspection” means a visual analysis performed for compensation for the purpose of providing a professional opinion and home inspection report by a licensed home inspector, regarding the condition of a residential dwelling and the dwelling’s attached garages and carports, any reasonable accessible installed components, and the operation of the dwelling’s systems, including any controls normally operated by the owner of the dwelling, for systems and components in the standards of practice established by the board. Home inspection shall not include a code compliance inspection, or an inspection required under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. secs. 5401 et seq., as amended, and rules and regulations issued thereunder, or KRS 227.600 regarding manufactured homes;

“Home inspection report” means a written report prepared by a licensed home inspector for compensation and issued after a home inspection. The report shall include the following:

A report on any system or component inspected that, in the professional opinion of the inspector, is significantly deficient;

The inspector’s recommendation to repair or monitor deficiencies reported under paragraph (a) of this subsection;

A list of any systems or components that were designated for inspection in the standards of practice adopted by the board but that were not inspected; and

The reason a system or component listed under paragraph (c) of this subsection was not inspected;

“Home inspector” means an individual who performs home inspections for compensation;

“Licensee” means a person who performs home inspections and who is licensed under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 as a home inspector; and

“Residential dwelling” means a structure consisting of at least one (1) but not more than four (4) units, each designed for occupancy by a single family, whether the units are occupied or unoccupied.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 100, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 297, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.702.
Exemptions from requirements of KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738.

KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 shall apply to an individual who conducts home inspections for compensation, but shall not apply to the following:

An individual who is acting within the scope of the individual’s employment as:

A code enforcement official for the state or a political subdivision of the state; or

A representative of a state or local housing agency or an individual acting under the authority of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;

An individual who is acting within the scope of the individual’s license as a licensed:

Architect under KRS Chapter 323;

Professional engineer under KRS Chapter 322;

Plumbing contractor or journeyman plumber under KRS Chapter 318;

Electrician, master electrician, or electrical contractor under KRS Chapter 227A;

Liquefied petroleum gas dealers under KRS Chapter 234;

Master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor, journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic, or an apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic under this chapter; or

Fire protection sprinkler contractor, fire protection system certificate holder, or certified fire sprinkler inspector under this chapter;

An individual licensed under KRS Chapter 324 as a real estate broker, broker-salesperson, or salesperson and is acting within the scope of the individual’s license;

An individual who is licensed under KRS Chapter 324A as a real estate appraiser and is acting within the scope of the individual’s license;

An individual who holds a license under KRS Chapter 304 as an insurance adjuster and is acting within the scope of the individual’s license;

An individual who holds a permit, certificate, or license to:

Use and apply pesticides; or

Make diagnostic inspections and reports for wood destroying pests and fungi under KRS Chapter 217B and is acting within the scope of the individual’s certificate or license;

An individual who holds a license from a political subdivision as a tradesperson or home builder and is acting within the scope of the individual’s license;

An individual who holds a current and valid license, certificate, or permit under KRS 227.550 to 227.660 and is acting within the scope of the individual’s license, certificate, or permit as a:

Manufactured home retailer;

Manufactured home certified retailer; or

Manufactured home certified installer; or

A person not subject to licensure by the Commonwealth who is engaged in providing estimates for remodeling or repair to a residential dwelling.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 298, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.704.
Kentucky Board of Home Inspectors — Members — Removal — Compensation — Meetings.

There is hereby created an independent agency of state government to be known as the Kentucky Board of Home Inspectors, which shall be attached to the Department of Professional Licensing for administrative purposes. The board shall consist of five (5) members, each appointed by the Governor. Each board member shall serve a term of three (3) years. The board shall annually select one (1) of its members to serve as chair and one (1) of its members to serve as vice chair to act in the chair’s absence. The board shall designate either a board member or a member of the board’s administrative staff to serve as secretary to the board.
(1) (a)

There is hereby created an independent agency of state government to be known as the Kentucky Board of Home Inspectors, which shall be attached to the Department of Professional Licensing for administrative purposes. The board shall consist of five (5) members, each appointed by the Governor. Each board member shall serve a term of three (3) years. The board shall annually select one (1) of its members to serve as chair and one (1) of its members to serve as vice chair to act in the chair’s absence. The board shall designate either a board member or a member of the board’s administrative staff to serve as secretary to the board.

Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.

No more than three (3) members of the same political party shall serve on the board at the same time.

No member of the board shall reside in the same county as another member. The members of the board shall be residents of Kentucky.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members is necessary for the board to take official action.
(e) 1.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members is necessary for the board to take official action.

If the chair and vice chair are absent from a meeting of the board when a quorum exists, the members who are present may elect a presiding officer who shall serve as acting chair until the conclusion of the meeting or until the arrival of the chair or vice chair.

No member may serve on the board for more than six (6) consecutive years. A member may serve on the board for six (6) consecutive years on more than one (1) occasion if that person is not a member of the board for at least two (2) years between periods of board service.

The five (5) members of the board shall be chosen as follows:

Three (3) members shall:

Have been actively engaged in performing home inspections in Kentucky for at least five (5) years immediately before the member’s appointment to the board, or have completed no less than one hundred (100) fee-paid inspections per year over the last five (5) years; and

Be licensed by the board as a home inspector;

One (1) member shall represent the public at large and shall not be associated with the home inspection, home building, or real estate business other than as a consumer; and

One (1) member shall be a real estate professional licensed under KRS Chapter 324 who has been actively engaged in selling, trading, exchanging, optioning, leasing, renting, managing, or listing residential real estate in Kentucky for at least five (5) years immediately before the member’s appointment to the board. This member shall be selected from a list of three (3) names submitted to the Governor from the Kentucky Association of Realtors. When a vacancy occurs in this member position, the Kentucky Association of Realtors shall have sixty (60) days after the vacancy occurs to submit a list of three (3) names to the Governor to fill the vacancy. The Governor may reject the list of three (3) names and request that the Kentucky Association of Realtors submit a new list of three (3) names within sixty (60) days of the Governor’s request. If the Kentucky Association of Realtors fails to timely submit this list to the Governor, the Governor may immediately appoint a qualified person to fill this vacancy.

A board member shall be automatically removed from the board and a vacancy shall occur when the board member:

Ceases to be a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

Displays incompetence, neglect of duty, or unprofessional conduct;

Fails to adhere to a duly adopted code of ethics of the board. Failure to adhere to this code shall be determined by official action of the board;

Enters a plea of guilty to, or has been found guilty of, a felony and the time for appeal has passed or the judgment of conviction has been finally affirmed on appeal; or

Misses three (3) consecutive meetings or misses more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the meetings held over the previous twelve (12) month period.

Voting members of the board shall be compensated no more than three hundred dollars ($300) per day for official business, subject to an annual maximum of six thousand dollars ($6,000). Members shall be reimbursed for all expenses paid and incurred in the discharge of official business consistent with the reimbursement policy for state employees. With the approval of the executive director of the Kentucky Real Estate Authority within the Department of Professional Licensing, board members and board staff may attend and travel to and from meetings and events relevant to the board or the industry the board represents.

The board shall meet at least quarterly each calendar year upon the call of the chair or the written request of a majority of the members of the board.

The chair shall establish the date, time, and place for each meeting.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 77, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 299, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 5, effective June 8, 2011; repealed and reenacted 2017, ch. 178, § 17, effective April 11, 2017.

198B.706.
Duties and powers of board.

The board shall:

Through the promulgation of administrative regulations:

Determine the requirements for and prescribe the form of licenses, applications, and other documents that are required by KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738; and

Require that a home inspection report include a statement that the home inspection report does not address environmental hazards and list all other exclusions with specificity;

Grant, deny, suspend, and revoke approval of examinations and courses of study regarding home inspections;

Issue or deny applications for licensure and renewals;

Investigate complaints concerning licensees, or persons the board has reason to believe should be licensees, including complaints concerning failure to comply with KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 or administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738, and, when appropriate, take action in accordance with KRS 198B.728 and 198B.730;

Bring actions in the name of the state in an appropriate court in order to enforce compliance with KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 or the administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738;

Establish license fees in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) annually;

Inspect the records of a licensee in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the board;

Conduct or designate a member or other representative to conduct public hearings on any matter for which a hearing is required under KRS 198B.728 and 198B.730;

Adopt a seal containing the words “Kentucky Board of Home Inspectors” and, through the board’s secretary, certify copies and authenticate all acts of the board;

Use counsel, consultants, and other persons, enter into contracts, and authorize expenditures that are reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;

Establish continuing education requirements for licensed home inspectors in accordance with KRS 198B.722 and 198B.724;

Conduct disciplinary actions against licensees to include:

Suspension, probation, or permanent revocation of a license;

Requiring a licensee to obtain additional continuing education; and

Issuance of a written reprimand;

Require all fee-paid home inspections to be conducted in accordance with the standards of practice of:

The American Society of Home Inspectors;

The International Association of Certified Home Inspectors; or

Any other approved standards of practice that are equal to the standards of practice of the organizations in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection as determined by the board.

Exercise all other powers specifically conferred on the board under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738; and

Promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the effective administration and the requirements of KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738, with the approval of the executive director of the Kentucky Real Estate Authority.

The board may establish standards of practice for home inspectors licensed in Kentucky at a later date, which will supersede any other standards of practice previously adopted by the board and, if adopted by regulation, the standards in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection;

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 100, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 100, § 6, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 178, § 18, effective April 11, 2017.

198B.708.
Department to provide board with administrative supports. [Repealed.]

198B.710.
Revolving fund.

There is established in the State Treasury a revolving fund for the use by the board.

All fees and other money received by the board in accordance with KRS 198B.706, 198B.712, 198B.714, 198B.722, and 198B.724 shall be deposited in the revolving fund established in subsection (1) of this section.

No part of this revolving fund shall revert to the general fund.

The compensation of board members and all of the board’s expenses incurred by the board shall be paid from this revolving fund.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 100, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 100, § 7, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.712.
License required — Qualifications — Application — Insurance — Fee.

An individual shall not advertise or claim to be a home inspector and shall not conduct a home inspection for compensation without first obtaining a license as a home inspector.

An individual shall not advertise as, claim to be, or engage in or work at the trade of home inspection unless an owner or employee of that business is a licensed home inspector.

The board shall deny a license to any applicant who fails to:

Furnish evidence satisfactory to the board, showing that the individual:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Possesses a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma; and

Meets other criteria established by the board through promulgation of administrative regulations;

Verify the information submitted on the application form;

Complete a board-approved training program or course of study involving the performance of home inspections, and pass an examination prescribed or approved by the board;

Submit to the board a certificate of insurance that is acceptable to the board and that:

Is issued by an insurance company or other legal entity authorized to transact insurance business in Kentucky;

Provides for general liability coverage of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);

Lists the Kentucky Board of Home Inspectors as the certificate holder of any insurance policy satisfying the requirements of this paragraph;

States that cancellation and nonrenewal of the underlying policy is not effective until the board receives at least ten (10) days’ prior written notice of the cancellation or nonrenewal; and

Contains any other terms and conditions established by the board; or

Pay a licensing fee established in KRS 198B.706.

An individual applying for a license as a home inspector shall apply on a written or electronic form prescribed and provided by the board.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 182, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 100, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 100, § 8, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 63, § 26, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.714.
Reciprocity for licensees of other states.

The licensing requirements for a home inspector may be waived for a person moving to Kentucky from another jurisdiction, and the person may be granted a license as a home inspector if:

The other jurisdiction grants the same privileges to licensees of Kentucky as Kentucky grants to licensees of that other jurisdiction;

The person is licensed in the other jurisdiction;

The licensing requirements of the other jurisdiction are determined by the board to be substantially similar to the requirements of KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738; and

The person states that he or she has studied, is familiar with, and will abide by KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 and the administrative regulations promulgated by the board.

A person seeking a license as a home inspector under this section shall:

Apply on a form prescribed and provided by the board; and

Pay the applicable licensing fee established by the board.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 100, § 9, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.716.
Nonresident licensees — Service of process — Credit for out-of-state training programs.

A nonresident whom the board determines meets the requirements of KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 and who files the written consent described in subsection (2) of this section may be licensed as a home inspector in Kentucky.

A nonresident applicant shall file with the board a written consent stating that, if licensed:

The applicant agrees to the commencement of any action arising out of the conduct of the applicant’s business in Kentucky in the county in which the events giving rise to the cause of action occurred;

The applicant:

Agrees to provide to the board the name and address of an agent to receive service of process in Kentucky; or

Consents to the board acting as the applicant’s agent for the purpose of receiving service of process if:

An agent’s name and address have not been filed with the board; or

The agent’s name and address on file with the board are incorrect; and

The applicant agrees that service of process in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure is proper service and subjects the applicant to the jurisdiction of Kentucky courts.

The board may consider and accept the successful completion by a nonresident of a training program or course of study completed in another state in lieu of the requirements of KRS 198B.712(3)(c) if the board determines the training program or course of study meets or exceeds the requirements of KRS 198B.712(3)(c) and its implementing administrative regulations, or the board may give credit for such program or course of study towards meeting the requirements of KRS 198B.712(3)(c). The nonresident shall still be subject to the examination requirements of KRS 198B.712(3)(c).

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 100, § 11, effective July 15, 2008.

198B.718.
License remains property of board.

All licenses issued by the board shall remain the property of the board.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 10, effective July 13, 2004.

198B.720.
Notification to board.

A licensee shall notify the board within thirty (30) days of any change of:

Name;

Name under which the licensee conducts business; or

Business address.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 11, effective July 13, 2004.

198B.722.
Expiration of license — Renewal — Continuing education — Inactive license.

The initial license for a home inspector issued in accordance with KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738, shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month in the following year. The board may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial licenses issued for less than twelve (12) months.

Renewed licenses shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month of each even numbered year after the date of issuance of the renewed license.

An individual who applies to renew a license as a licensed home inspector shall:

Furnish evidence showing successful completion of the continuing education requirements of this section;

Pay the renewal fee and late fee, if applicable, established by the board;

Show proof of general liability insurance in the amount required by KRS 198B.712(3)(d); and

Submit a recent background check performed by the Kentucky State Police.

Renewal notices shall be sent to each licensee at least sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the license. The notice shall inform the licensee of the need to renew and the requirement of payment of the renewal fee.

Renewal and applicable late fees shall be paid with a credit card, a draft, a money order, a cashier’s check, a certified or other personal check, or, if payment is made in person, the payment may be made in cash. If the board receives an uncertified personal check for the renewal fee and if the check does not clear the bank, the board may refuse to renew the license.

Each licensee shall complete the continuing education required by the board prior to applying for license renewal. This requirement shall not exceed thirty (30) hours per two (2) year license cycle.

The board may, through the promulgation of administrative regulations:

Establish an inactive license for licensees who are not actively engaging in the home inspection business but wish to maintain their license;

Reduce license and renewal fees for inactive licenses; and

Waive the insurance requirements established in KRS 198B.712 for inactive licenses.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 12, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 100, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 100, § 10, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.724.
Continuing education requirements.

The board shall promulgate administrative regulations concerning the continuing education required for the renewal of a home inspector license and shall:

Establish procedures for approving organizations that provide continuing education; and

Prescribe the content, duration, and organization of continuing education courses that contribute to the competence of home inspectors.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 13, effective July 13, 2004.

198B.726.
Licensure or registration of home inspectors by agencies or political subdivisions prohibited.

As used in this section, “political subdivision” means any city, county, or consolidated local government.

No agency or political subdivision of the state, other than the board, shall impose the following on individuals licensed under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738:

A registration or licensing requirement; or

A license fee to obtain any local license, except that this prohibition shall not prevent any local government from imposing an occupational license tax on any person operating as a home inspector within the jurisdiction of the local government.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 14, effective July 13, 2004.

198B.728.
Disciplinary actions — Sanctions — Final order — Appeal.

The board shall take disciplinary actions against or impose sanctions on a licensee for failing to comply with any provision of KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 or any administrative regulations promulgated to carry out KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738.

Pursuant to KRS 13B.120(7), the executive director of the Kentucky Real Estate Authority within the Department of Professional Licensing shall hear and issue a final order regarding any decision of the board. An aggrieved party may appeal a final order of the executive director pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B within thirty (30) days after the issuance of the order to the Circuit Court of the county where the licensee has his or her principal place of business or where the license applicant resides.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 15, effective July 13, 2004; 2017 ch. 178, § 19, effective April 11, 2017.

198B.730.
Disciplinary hearings — Emergency suspension — Persons not licensed to show cause — Cease and desist order.

The procedures set forth in KRS Chapter 13B shall govern the board’s conduct of disciplinary hearings.

The board may summarily suspend a license for up to ninety (90) days before a final adjudication or during an appeal of the board’s determination if the board finds that the licensee would represent a clear and immediate danger to the public’s health, safety, or property if allowed to perform home inspections. The summary suspension may be renewed upon a hearing before the board for up to ninety (90) days.

If the board:

Determines that an individual is not licensed under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738 and is engaged in or believed to be engaged in activities for which a license is required under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738, the board shall issue an order to that individual requiring the individual to show cause why the individual should not be ordered to cease and desist from the activities. The show cause order shall set forth a date, time, and place for a hearing at which the individual shall appear and show cause why the individual should not be subject to licensing under KRS 198B.700 to 198B.738;

Prior to a hearing, the board may issue a cease and desist order that identifies the individual and describes activities that are the subject of the order.

A cease and desist order issued under this section shall be enforceable in a Circuit Court of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 16, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 100, § 11, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.732.
Prohibited activities — Penalties — Burden of proof.

An individual is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor if the individual:

Performs or offers to perform home inspections for compensation in Kentucky without being licensed as a home inspector and without being exempt from licensing;

Presents as the individual’s own the license of another;

Intentionally gives false or materially misleading information to the board or to a board member in connection with a licensing matter;

Impersonates another licensee; or

Uses an expired, suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted license.

An individual is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the individual is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this section within five (5) years of a prior conviction of an offense under this section.

When entering a judgment for an offense under this section, the court shall impose a service fee of an amount equal to any fee or other compensation earned by the individual in the commission of the offense.

Each transaction involving unauthorized activities as described in this section shall constitute a separate offense.

In all actions for the collection of a fee or other compensation for performing home inspections, the party seeking relief shall allege and prove that, at the time that the cause of action arose, the party seeking relief was not in violation of KRS 198B.712.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 17, effective July 13, 2004.; 2008, ch. 100, § 7, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 301, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 12, effective June 8, 2011.

198B.734.
Statute of limitations on action for damages against home inspector. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

198B.736.
Alternative requirements for licensure. [Repealed.]

198B.738.
Home inspectors prohibited from indicating compliance or noncompliance with Kentucky Residential Code.

Home inspectors, when acting in that capacity, are prohibited from indicating orally or in writing that any condition is or is not in compliance with the Kentucky Residential Code.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 20, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 100, § 9, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 100, § 13, effective June 8, 2011.